New York, session 2025-2026, S2247.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The section heading of section 6401 of the education law, 2 as amended by chapter 186 of the laws of 1977, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 [State aid for certain independent institutions of higher learning] 5 Leonard P. Stavisky student success grants. 6 § 2. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 2 of section 6401 of the education 7 law is amended by adding a new subparagraph (vii) to read as follows: 8 (vii) The institution must submit a report on the use of the appor- 9 tionment received including how it supported student success. 10 § 3. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 2 of section 6401 of the education 11 law is amended by adding a new subparagraph (vii) to read as follows: 12 (vii) The sponsoring college must submit a report on the use of the 13 apportionment received including how it supported student success. 14 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04909-01-5